Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 2

National Guard

58-1-201. Organization of state headquarters — Army division — Air division.

The state headquarters of the national guard is hereby organized and divided into an army division and an air division, with an officer whose rank shall be designated by the governor as the head of each division; provided, that no such officer's rank shall be higher than major general. The head of the army division shall be designated as assistant adjutant general for army, and the head of the air division shall be designated as assistant adjutant general for air. The governor is further authorized to appoint for the army division or the air division a deputy assistant adjutant general; provided, that no such officer's rank shall be higher than brigadier general. Such officer shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and shall perform military duties as assigned by the adjutant general.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 16; T.C.A., § 7-117; Acts 1993, ch. 158, § 1.

Cross-References. Exemption from provisions prohibiting carrying of weapons, § 39-17-1315.

Law Reviews.

Protecting Civilian Employment and Providing Healthcare to the Citizen Soldier in the National Guard and Reserve Components, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 915 (2015).

58-1-202. Organization and training — Laws and regulations of United States.

The national guard shall be organized, armed, disciplined, governed, administered, and trained as prescribed by parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter and the regulations issued thereunder; provided, however, that the governor shall conform the organization of the national guard to the organization prescribed by the laws of the United States and the lawful regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. To that end, the governor is hereby authorized to organize, reorganize or disband any unit, headquarters or staff therein, to increase or decrease the number of commissioned officers, warrant officers and noncommissioned officers of any grade therein and to increase or decrease the strength of the national guard.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 17; T.C.A., § 7-118.

58-1-203. Army national guard.

The land force of the national guard shall be the army national guard and shall comprise the army units which are a part of the national guard on March 2, 1970, and such other army units as may be organized hereafter, including the personnel who are enlisted, appointed or commissioned therein; provided, that all persons who are members of the army national guard shall be federally recognized as such.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 18; T.C.A., § 7-119.

58-1-204. Air national guard.

The air force of the national guard shall be the air national guard and shall comprise the air units which are a part of the national guard on March 2, 1970, and such other air units as may be organized hereafter, including the personnel who are enlisted, appointed or commissioned therein; provided, that all persons who are members of the air national guard shall be federally recognized as such. The light aviation units of the army national guard shall not be considered air units within the meaning of parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 19; T.C.A., § 7-120.

58-1-205. Assemblies, annual training and other duty.

Members and units of the national guard shall assemble for such drill, or other equivalent training, instruction or duties during each year and shall participate in such field training, encampments, maneuvers, schools, conferences, or other similar duties each year as may be ordered by competent authority; provided, that no assembly of any unit of the national guard shall be ordered in time of peace for any day during which a state or federal election shall be held, except in case of disaster, riot, attack, invasion or insurrection or imminent danger thereof.

Members of the national guard, with their consent, may be ordered by the governor, or under the governor's authority, to perform special duty, including, but not limited to, duty, as a member of, or in any other capacity with, any military board, or as an investigating officer or medical examiner.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 20; T.C.A., § 7-121.

Cross-References. Offenses and penalties applicable to the national guard while in a drill or duty status, § 58-1-632.

58-1-206. Maintenance of national guard units.

In the event adequate and satisfactory armory accommodations, bases, camps, target ranges and other facilities are not furnished by the United States, counties or municipal corporations, the same may be provided and maintained by the state.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 21; T.C.A., § 7-122.

Cross-References. Armories and other military property and equipment, title 58, ch. 1, part 5.

58-1-207. Inactive national guard.

The inactive national guard shall consist of the persons commissioned, appointed or enlisted therein on March 2, 1970, such officers and enlisted personnel as may be hereafter transferred thereto from the army national guard and the air national guard and such persons as lawfully may be enlisted therein.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 22; T.C.A., § 7-123.

58-1-208. Funds — Accounting requirements — Post exchanges and canteens — Regulations governing.

All unit funds, known as company, battalion, and regimental funds, however derived, in the hands of national guard organizations including the “station commander's upkeep and maintenance fund,” shall be accounted for in accordance with regulations promulgated by the adjutant general. Post exchanges, canteen and similar activities shall likewise be operated and regulated in accordance with such regulations.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 26; T.C.A., § 7-124.

58-1-209. Appointment and promotion of commissioned officers.

All commissioned officers of the national guard shall be considered for appointment and promotion by the governor upon the recommendation of appropriate commanders and under regulations promulgated pursuant to parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 28; T.C.A., § 7-125.

Cross-References. Assignments, transfers and promotions, § 58-1-213.

State system of personnel administration, title 8, ch. 30.

58-1-210. Commissioned officers — Qualifications.

No person shall be appointed or promoted as a commissioned officer of the national guard unless such person shall have passed such examination as to the person's physical, moral and professional qualifications as may be prescribed by the laws of the United States and by parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter and the regulations issued thereunder. No person shall be recognized as a commissioned officer of the national guard and no appointment as such shall become effective until the person shall have taken and subscribed to an oath of office.

Any person who has been dismissed or discharged from the national guard of this or any other state or from the armed forces of the United States or any reserve component thereof, under other than honorable conditions, and has not been restored to duty, shall not be eligible for appointment as a commissioned officer in the national guard.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 29; T.C.A., § 7-126.

58-1-211. Commissioned officers — Oath.

Every commissioned officer shall take and subscribe to the oath of office prescribed for officers of the national guard by the applicable laws of the United States and regulations issued pursuant thereto, and to parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter. Such oath shall be taken and subscribed before an officer of the national guard authorized to administer oaths as provided in parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter, or before a notary public or other officer authorized by the laws of this state to administer oaths.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 30; T.C.A., § 7-127.

Cross-References. Authority to administer oaths, § 58-1-234.

58-1-212. Precedence and date of rank.

Precedence or relative rank among officers of the same grade in the Tennessee national guard will be determined as follows:

The date of rank is the date of federal recognition in the national guard; provided, that the officer has had no prior active federal or reserve component service in the same or higher grade;

When an officer has had prior active or reserve component service in the same or higher grade, the officer's date of rank will precede the date of federal recognition by a period equal to the total length of such service (inactive service in either the army of the United States, reserve or national guard will not count);

When the date of rank of two (2) or more officers is the same when computed under either subdivision (1) or (2), the senior will be determined by the length of active commissioned service in the national guard. Further determination will be made by total active commissioned service in all components, then by age.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 31; T.C.A., § 7-128.

58-1-213. Assignments and promotions.

Officers will be assigned, transferred and promoted under regulations prescribed and published pursuant to parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 32; T.C.A., § 7-129.

Cross-References. Appointment and promotion, §§ 58-1-209, 58-1-210.

58-1-214. Officer's uniforms.

Every commissioned officer shall personally provide such uniforms and articles of equipment as may be prescribed by regulations issued pursuant to parts 1, 2, and 4-6 of this chapter.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 33; T.C.A., § 7-130.

Cross-References. Dress uniforms, § 58-1-232.

58-1-215. Efficiency and medical examining boards — Appointment — Authority.

The efficiency, moral character and general fitness for retention of any commissioned officer may be investigated and determined by an examining board. The members of an examining board shall be senior in rank to the officer under investigation unless unavailable.

The physical fitness for further service of any commissioned officer may be investigated and determined by a medical examining board of officers.

Efficiency and medical examining boards shall be appointed by, or upon direction of, the governor. Whenever an examining board shall be appointed for the purpose of determining the fitness of any officer for continued federal recognition, such board shall be appointed by the commander designated in the applicable laws of the United States and the regulations issued thereunder.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 34; T.C.A., § 7-131.

58-1-216. Efficiency and medical examining boards — Procedure.

Efficiency and medical examining boards appointed by the governor shall follow the practice and procedure prescribed by applicable laws of the United States and this state, and the regulations issued thereunder, including the right to subpoena witnesses. Any officer ordered to appear before such a board shall be allowed to appear in person or by counsel, to cross-examine witnesses and to call witnesses in the officer's behalf. The officer shall at all stages of the proceedings be allowed full access to the records pertinent to the case and be furnished with copies of the same. Failure to appear before any such examining board shall be sufficient ground for a finding by such board that the officer ordered to appear be discharged. If the findings of such board are unfavorable to an officer and are approved as provided by applicable laws of the United States or the state, the governor shall relieve the officer from duty and shall give the officer a discharge in such form as may be appropriate. If the discharge of an officer is recommended solely because of physical inability to perform active service, such officer may be transferred to the Tennessee national guard retired list in accordance with parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter.

The national guard efficiency and medical examining board appointed by the governor shall periodically be subject to review pursuant to the governmental entity review law simultaneously with, and as an adjunct to, the military department.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 35; T.C.A., § 7-132; Acts 1985, ch. 64, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1985, ch. 64, § 1 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that the national guard efficiency and medical examining board, as of July 1, 1985, be reviewed and evaluated by the military department of the state of Tennessee, and that upon legislative oversight pursuant to the governmental entity review law, the military department shall have the burden of demonstrating the public need for the national guard efficiency and medical examining board's continued existence and shall recommend any changes which would increase its operational or administrative effectiveness.

Cross-References. Retired list, § 58-1-219.

58-1-217. Resignation of officers.

A commissioned officer of the national guard may tender resignation at any time to the governor. If the governor shall accept the resignation, the officer shall receive an honorable discharge; if the officer tendering the resignation shall be under arrest or if charges have been preferred against the officer for the commission of an offense punishable by a court-martial, the governor shall await the outcome of such charges and then issue or cause to be issued such a discharge in such form as may be indicated.

Enlistment in the regular army, air force, navy, marine corps or coast guard of the United States shall be deemed a resignation by the person so enlisted of all commissions held in the military forces of this state.

No officer shall be discharged or permitted to resign until having accounted for all military funds or property entrusted to the officer's care.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 36; T.C.A., § 7-133.

58-1-218. Officers — Termination of appointments.

The appointment of a national guard officer will be terminated and the officer's state recognition withdrawn for the following causes and reasons, and none other:

Death;

Attainment of maximum ages as prescribed in federal law. Nothing in parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter shall be construed to give any officer the assurance of serving until the officer has reached the maximum age, the maximum age being merely definitive of the maximum age to which the officer may serve if the officer's recognition is not withdrawn for other causes enumerated in this section. The appointment of any army medical department (AMMED) officer may be extended by the governor or the adjutant general if the officer can continue to serve as a federally recognized member of the reserve components under applicable federal law or the rules and regulations of the national guard bureau of the United States. The adjutant general may, in the adjutant general's sole discretion, extend the termination of any warrant officer to the last day of the month in which the officer reaches age sixty-two (62);

Withdrawal of federal recognition. Whenever an officer is terminated or the officer's federal recognition is withdrawn by the valid action of the federal government, including terminations as a result of the application of the Reserve Officer's Personnel Act, as amended, such action will operate to terminate the officer's state appointment and as a withdrawal of the officer's state recognition;

Pursuant to the finding of efficiency and medical boards as provided for in §§ 58-1-215 and 58-1-216;

Resignation;

Absence without leave for three (3) months;

Failure, without justification, to complete a year of satisfactory federal service;

Conviction of any crime involving moral turpitude;

The acceptance of an appointment, or the enlistment, in any of the other military services of the United States;

Induction into active military service under the Universal Military Training and Service Act, as amended;

When it has been determined that the officer is subversive or disloyal;

In the case of a chaplain, when ecclesiastical endorsement is withdrawn by the church of the officer's faith;

In the case of an officer of the medical or dental corps, when the officer's license or right to practice such officer's profession has been terminated by proper authority;

In the case of an officer of the judge advocate general's corps, when by action of appropriate authorities, the officer is refused the privilege of practicing law, or that privilege is withdrawn; or

In the case of general officers, their appointments may also be terminated and their state recognition withdrawn under § 58-1-220.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 37; 1973, ch. 353, § 1; 1978, ch. 787, § 1; T.C.A., § 7-134; Acts 1993, ch. 69, § 1; 2007, ch. 23, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Reserve Officer's Personnel Act, referred to in this section, was compiled in 50 U.S.C. §§ 1181 — 1397, but has been repealed. See 10 U.S.C. § 101 et seq.

The Universal Military Training and Service Act, referred to in this section, and now known as the Military Selective Service Act of 1967, is compiled in 50 U.S.C. app. § 451 et seq.

58-1-219. Officers — Retired list.

When the appointment of any officer is terminated and federal recognition withdrawn pursuant to § 58-1-218(2), the officer's name shall be placed upon the national guard retired list. Those terminated under § 58-1-218(3), (4), (5) and (7), may also be placed upon such list if the termination was not occasioned by misconduct or undesirable habits and traits of character.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 38; T.C.A., § 7-135.

58-1-220. General officers — Tenure.

No general officer of the line and no air guard general officer, unless the officer be the adjutant general, deputy adjutant general, or an assistant adjutant general army and an assistant adjutant general air, shall serve more than three (3) years as a federally recognized general officer. Should a general officer of the line or an air guard general officer of the line hold the rank of major general or occupy a vacancy designated to be held by a major general, such general officer shall, at the discretion of the adjutant general, be allowed to serve for two (2) additional years from the date such general officer is federally recognized as a major general.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 39; 1975, ch. 263, § 1; 1978, ch. 664, § 1; T.C.A., § 7-136.

58-1-221. Enlisted personnel — Period of service.

The qualifications for enlistment and reenlistment, the period of enlistment, reenlistment and voluntary extension of enlistment, the period of service, the form of oath to be taken, and the manner and form of transfer and discharge of enlisted personnel of the national guard shall be those prescribed by applicable laws of the United States and by parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter and by regulations issued thereunder.

Any person who has been discharged under other than honorable conditions from the military forces of this or any other state or from any component of the armed forces of the United States and has not been restored to duty shall not be eligible for enlistment in any force of the national guard.

The governor is authorized to extend the period of any enlistment, reenlistment, voluntary extension of enlistment and the period of service of enlisted personnel of the national guard for, but not exceeding, the duration of an emergency declared by the governor.

Whenever the period of enlistment, reenlistment, voluntary extension of enlistment and the period of service of enlisted personnel of the reserve components of the armed forces of the United States is extended, the governor shall extend the period of enlistment, reenlistment, voluntary extension of enlistment and the period of service of enlisted personnel in the national guard for the same period.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 40; T.C.A., § 7-137.

Cross-References. State system of personnel administration, title 8, ch. 30.

58-1-222. Contract and oath of enlistment.

Every person who enlists or reenlists in the national guard shall sign an enlistment contract and shall take and subscribe to such oath or affirmation of enlistment as may be prescribed by the applicable laws of the United States and by regulations issued pursuant to parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter. Such oath shall be taken and subscribed before any officer of the national guard. A person making a false oath as to any statement contained in such enlistment contract shall, upon conviction, be deemed guilty of perjury.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 41; T.C.A., § 7-138.

Cross-References. Authority to administer enlistment oaths, § 58-1-234.

Effecting unlawful enlistment, penalty, §§ 58-1-612, 58-1-631.

False official statements, penalty, §§ 58-1-622, 58-1-631.

Fraudulent enlistment, penalty, §§ 58-1-611, 58-1-631.

Penalties under military code, § 58-1-631.

58-1-223. Promotions and reductions.

Enlisted personnel of the national guard shall be promoted and reduced in grade or rank as prescribed by regulations issued pursuant to parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 42; T.C.A., § 7-139.

58-1-224. Discharges.

An enlisted person may be discharged from the national guard prior to the expiration of that person’s term of enlistment under such conditions as may be prescribed by applicable laws and regulations of the United States and by parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

An enlisted person discharged from the national guard shall receive a discharge in writing in such form and of such type of classification as may be prescribed by applicable laws and regulations of the United States and by regulations issued pursuant to parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 43; T.C.A., § 7-140.

58-1-225. Absence without leave.

When an enlisted person of the national guard is absent without leave or misses all scheduled drills without proper authority for five (5) drills, within any twelve-month period and there is reason to believe that the enlisted person does not intend to return, the enlisted person may be discharged, or if the enlisted person is an obligor, such person may be ordered to extended active duty as provided by appropriate federal regulation.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 44; T.C.A., § 7-141.

58-1-226. Exemption from civil process and arrest.

Except for the commission of treason, a felony or a breach of the peace, the officers and enlisted personnel of the national guard shall be exempt from service of civil process and from arrest while actually engaged in the following activities:

Drill;

Instruction;

Voluntary aid and assistance; or

Other military duty.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 89; 1978, ch. 830, § 3; T.C.A., § 7-142.

58-1-227. Relief from civil or criminal liability.

Members of the national guard ordered into the active service of the state, pursuant to § 58-1-106, shall receive the same immunity afforded by law to state employees for acts done in the performance of their duty while at their post of duty. When an action or proceeding of any nature shall be commenced in any court by any person against any member of the national guard for any act done by the guard member in guard member's official capacity in the discharge of guard member's assigned duty under parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter, or an alleged omission by guard member to do an act which it was the guard member's duty to perform or against any person acting under lawful authority or orders or by virtue of any warrant issued by guard member pursuant to law, the governor shall designate counsel to represent and defend such guard member. All compensation of such counsel and all costs and expenses in connection with the action shall be payable from the funds appropriated to the military department.

Officers and enlisted personnel of the national guard who engage in voluntary aid and assistance shall receive the same immunity afforded by law to state employees for actions taken in the performance of their duty while at their post of duty. When an action is commenced in any court by any person against any officer or enlisted personnel of the national guard for actions in the course of voluntary aid and assistance, counsel shall be designated as provided by title 8, chapter 42 to represent and defend such guard member. All compensation of such counsel and all costs and expenses in connection with the action shall be payable from the funds appropriated to the military department.

Notwithstanding § 39-11-605 or § 39-11-622(a)(1)(B), if a member of the national guard uses force against another, including by discharging a personally owned firearm, and a civil cause of action is commenced against the national guard member alleging that the use of force resulted in the death or injury of, or property damage to, the person commencing the action, the national guard member shall have civil immunity with respect to any person commencing an action that is based on the national guard member's use of force, if the court in which the action is filed determines the national guard member:

Used force against the person bringing the action that was justifiable self-defense, in accordance with § 39-11-611, or justifiable defense of others, in accordance with § 39-11-612;

Was on duty or in uniform at the time force was used; and

If the use of force involved the discharge of a personally owned handgun, was authorized to possess or carry a handgun pursuant to § 39-17-1351 and authorized by the military department to carry a personally owned handgun while on-duty or in uniform.

As soon as possible after the national guard member's use of force, the attorney general and reporter shall investigate and determine whether the national guard member's use of force complied with the requirements of subdivisions (c)(1)(A)-(C). If the attorney general determines that the use of force was justifiable, the national guard member shall receive legal counsel designated as provided by title 8, chapter 42, to represent the national guard member if any action is commenced by any person against the national guard member that is based upon the national guard member's justified use of force.

If the attorney general and reporter determines the national guard member's use of force was not justified and declines to provide legal counsel, the provision of § 39-11-622(b) shall be applicable and available to the national guard member.

If any civil or administrative action is brought against the national guard member that is based on the national guard member's use of force, the trier of fact shall first determine if the use of force complied with the requirements of subdivisions (c)(1)(A)-(C). If the trier of fact finds the national guard member's use of force did comply, the action against the national guard member shall be dismissed.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 90; 1978, ch. 830, § 4; T.C.A., § 7-143; Acts 2016, ch. 778, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Immunity of Tennessee National Guardsmen on active duty, OAG 07-03, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/8/07).

58-1-228. National Guard Force Protection Act of 2016.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “National Guard Force Protection Act of 2016”.

The department of military may implement the following force protection enhancements at national guard facilities:

Aiphones;

Shatter resistant films;

Cameras;

Magnetic locks with keypads;

Mobile ballistic shields;

Barriers, including:

Permanent bollards;

Automatic bollards;

Manual removable bollards; and

Decorative barriers;

Privacy screens; and

Any other force protection enhancement deemed necessary by the department.

The adjutant general shall inform the general assembly upon completion of the force protection enhancements required pursuant to this section.

Acts 2016, ch. 747, §§ 1-3.

Code Commission Notes.

By authority of the Code Commission, Acts 2016, ch. 747, §§ 1-3 were codified as a new section. Acts 2016, ch. 747, § 1 was codified as § 58-1-228(a), Acts 2016, ch. 747, § 2 was codified as § 58-1-228(b) and Acts 2016, ch. 747, § 3 was codified as § 58-1-228(c).

Compiler's Notes. Former § 58-1-228 (Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 91; T.C.A., § 7-144), concerning jury duty exemption for national guard personnel, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 5, effective January 1, 2009.

Acts 2016, ch. 747, § 4, provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall not be construed to be an appropriation of funds, and no funds shall be obligated or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general appropriations act.

58-1-229. Exemption from duty on election day — Influencing election — Penalty.

No officer or enlisted personnel of the national guard, except in compliance with orders of the governor, shall be required to perform military duty on a day designated for the holding of any primary or general election in any city or civil district in the state; nor shall any officer or enlisted man of the national guard use military rank or status in any way to influence the result of any such election.

Whoever violates this section is guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 92; T.C.A., § 7-145; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

State guard influence of elections prohibited, § 58-1-402.

58-1-230. Awards in case of death or injury.

Death.

The division of claims and risk management is authorized after proper investigation to pay a death benefit to or for the survivor prescribed in subdivision (a)(3), upon receiving certification by the adjutant general of the death of any member of the national guard who:

Dies while performing full time training, or duty under §§ 58-1-106, 58-1-108 and 58-1-205; or

Dies within one hundred twenty (120) days thereafter if death resulted from injury sustained or disease incurred or aggravated while performing such training or duty or returning from the same.

The death benefit so paid shall be the same as those as are now provided under the Workers' Compensation Law of this state, compiled in title 50, chapter 6, or as that law shall be hereinafter amended; provided, however, that the benefit paid shall be based on and determined by the percentage of the average weekly pay the guard member would have received while on active federal duty; and provided further, that no benefit so paid shall be less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and at the option of the beneficiaries, the amount shall be paid in a lump sum and without being commuted. (3) (A) The benefit shall be paid to or for the benefit of the living survivor highest on the following list:

No further beneficiaries shall be recognized.

The death benefit herein provided shall be payable without regard to legal liability and the state shall not be entitled to subrogation in any instance.

Injuries. When any member of the national guard is injured while performing duty as set forth in subdivision (b)(1), the division of claims and risk management shall compensate guard member in the same manner and to the same extent as now provided under the Workers' Compensation Law of this state; provided, however, that:

The compensation so paid shall be based upon and determined by the percentage of the average weekly pay the guard member would have received while on active duty;

The compensation so received shall in no event be less than fifty dollars ($50.00) per week; and

The compensation shall be payable in a lump sum without commutation.

Coordination of Benefits. For the purpose of coordinating benefits payable from the state and from the federal government as the result of the death or injury of a member of the Tennessee national guard, any workers' compensation benefits provided by the state shall be reduced by the amount of any medical care, hospitalization, or incapacitation pay benefits paid by the federal government to such guard member or statutory beneficiary as the result of injury or death.

Investigation.

No benefits for death or injury shall be paid unless and until a board of Tennessee national guard officers appointed by the adjutant general consisting of not less than three (3) officers, at least one (1) of which shall be a medical officer, shall submit, after a full evidentiary hearing according to military regulations, its findings and recommendations for approval, certification, and transmittal by the adjutant general to the division of claims and risk management, that the deceased or injured guard member was in the course of employment at the time of his death or injury or when the disease or injury which produced death was incurred.

Upon receipt of the board's report and recommendations of the adjutant general, the division of claims and risk management shall determine whether the injury or death of such member of the national guard arose out of and in the course of employment under the Workers' Compensation Law of this state and, if appropriate, act upon such claim.

Appeal. Any guard member, or any statutory beneficiary as hereinabove enumerated, whose claim is denied by the division of claims and risk management shall have the right to file the guard member's claim with the claims commission within ninety (90) days of the date of such denial. Any decision of the claims commission pertaining to the death or injury of a member of the national guard shall be subject to judicial review pursuant to the procedure for workers' compensation cases under § 50-6-225.

Surviving spouse;

Children including children by adoption and illegitimate children who are members of the decedent's household and/or who have been acknowledged;

Parents;

Brothers and sisters in equal shares.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 67; 1976, ch. 756, § 1; T.C.A., § 7-147; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2; 1984, ch. 972, § 19; 1986, ch. 626, § 8; 2006, ch. 985, § 1; 2017, ch. 271, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Subsection (d) of this section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 3, 24.

This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Cross-References. Workers' Compensation, title 50, ch. 6, parts 1-4.

Law Reviews.

Remedies other than the Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act “Contested Case” Approach to Dealing with State and Local Governmental Action (John Beasley), 13 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 619 (1984).

Attorney General Opinions. Definition of “course of employment” for purposes of eligibility for benefits under T.C.A. § 58-1-230, OAG 03-085 (7/09/03).

58-1-231. Service medals.

A service medal shall be issued to each officer or enlisted member of the national guard at the completion of five (5) years of honorable service therein, continuous or otherwise, with a clasp indicating such service affixed thereto and for each additional five (5) years of like service a clasp to be affixed to such medal; provided, that all members of the national guard who were active members as officers or enlisted personnel of the military or naval forces of the United States in time of war and who received honorable discharge from such service shall be issued an additional clasp indicative of such wartime service to be affixed to the medal hereinabove provided.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 94; T.C.A., § 7-148.

Cross-References. Special license plates for active national guard members, § 55-4-255.

58-1-232. Dress uniforms.

Any organization of the national guard may, with the approval of the commander in chief, adopt and provide, at the expense of individual members thereof, a dress uniform for special occasions; such adopted uniform shall not be worn except as may be prescribed by the commander in chief.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 96; T.C.A., § 7-149.

Cross-References. Governor as commander in chief, § 58-1-105.

Officer's uniforms, § 58-1-214.

58-1-233. Membership in national guard associations.

The adjutant general is authorized and empowered to maintain membership for the Tennessee national guard in the national guard association of the United States or any similar organization, and with the approval of the governor is authorized to incur the usual expenses incident to such membership, which expenses will be included in the annual budget of the military department and paid from the appropriations provided for that department.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 86; T.C.A., § 7-150.

58-1-234. Authority to administer oaths.

The following officers of the national guard shall have power to administer oaths for the purposes of military administration, including military justice, and affidavits may be taken for such purposes before such officers:

All company, battery, squadron and similar unit commanders;

All adjutants, assistant adjutants, and personnel officers;

All staff judge advocates and legal officers and acting or assisting staff judge advocates and legal officers;

All officers detailed to conduct an investigation, or to take a statement or deposition; and

All commissioned officers are authorized to administer oaths for enlistment and appointment.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 98; T.C.A., § 7-151.

Cross-References. Commissioned officers in active service of the armed forces of the United States authorized to take oaths and acknowledgments, §§ 58-1-605, 58-1-607.

Oath of enlistment, § 58-1-222.

58-1-235. Patrons of national guard.

Any person, who contributes to a company fund of the Tennessee national guard the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) or more for the period of one (1) year shall be known as a patron of the national guard. The names of all such patrons, together with the amount contributed by each, shall be reported to the adjutant general who shall issue an appropriate card identifying such contribution as a friend, patron and supporter of the national guard.

Acts 1957, ch. 320, § 77; T.C.A., § 7-152.

58-1-236. Burial flag for family of deceased member of national guard.

The adjutant general shall present to the family of each eligible, deceased member of the national guard a Tennessee state flag, appropriate for use as a burial flag, upon application of a member of the family of the deceased guard member.

The adjutant general shall prepare an application form to be used to determine the eligibility of the deceased for the burial flag and shall furnish the form to the senior full-time employee in each armory.

The family of any individual who serves at least one (1) year in the national guard and who at the time of death is an active, honorably discharged, or retired member of the national guard is eligible to receive a burial flag.

The adjutant general may, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, promulgate rules to implement this section.

The adjutant general shall obtain flags from the federal government when available. If flags from the federal government are not available, the adjutant general shall purchase the flags from funds appropriated to the military department.

Acts 2017, ch. 430, § 1.